Louisiana, session 2026, SB259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2136.2(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2136.2. Louisiana Protective Order Registry; statewide portal
* * *
H. The judicial administrator's office may develop and implement a
statewide portal that allows petitioners to file an online petition requesting any
protective order authorized by this Part. Notwithstanding any provisions of R.S.
46:2134(D), any petition for a protective order filed through a statewide portal
shall require an affirmation signed and dated by electronic means by the
petitioner that the facts and circumstances contained in the petition are true
and correct to the best knowledge, information, and belief of the petitioner,
under penalty of perjury pursuant to R.S. 14:123. The affirmation shall be
made before a witness who shall sign his name electronically.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.